Connecticut, session 2026, HB05400.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 29-6d of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (a) For purposes of this section and section 7-277b:
5 (1) "Law enforcement unit" has the same meaning as provided in
6 section 7-294a;
7 (2) "Police officer" means a sworn member of a law enforcement unit
8 or any member of a law enforcement unit who performs police duties;
9 (3) "Body-worn recording equipment" means an electronic recording
10 device that is capable of recording audio and video;
11 (4) "Dashboard camera" means a dashboard camera with a remote
HB5400 / File No. 252 1

HB5400 File No. 252
12 recorder, as defined in section 7-277b;
13 (5) "Digital data storage device or service" means a device or service
14 that retains the data from the recordings made by body-worn recording
15 equipment using computer data storage; and
16 (6) "Police patrol vehicle" means any state or local police vehicle.
17 [other than] "Police patrol vehicle" does not include an administrative
18 vehicle in which an occupant is wearing body-worn camera equipment,
19 a bicycle, a motor scooter, an all-terrain vehicle, an electric personal
20 assistive mobility device, as defined in subsection (a) of section 14-289h,
21 or an animal control vehicle.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-6d(a)
PS Joint Favorable
HB5400 / File No. 252 2

HB5400 File No. 252
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which revises the definition of "police patrol vehicle," has no
fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5400 / File No. 252 3

HB5400 File No. 252
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5400
AN ACT REVISING THE DEFINITION OF "POLICE PATROL
VEHICLE".